ro-RO: Articole incluse în setul de decorațiuni auto: Odorizant; Minge pentru antenă; Covoraș/protecție pentru bord; Ornament pentru bord; Autocolant/sticker; Emblemă/insignă; Ornament suspendat pentru oglinda retrovizoare; Capac pentru cârligul de remorcare; Capac de protecție pentru numărul de înmatriculare; Suport pentru numărul de înmatriculare; Magnet; Husă pentru schimbătorul de viteze; Husă pentru volan; Capace pentru valve; Steag pentru geam; Altele
th: รวมชุดตกแต่งรถแล้ว: น้ำหอมปรับอากาศ; ตุ๊กตาเสียบเสาอากาศ; แผ่นปูคอนโซลหน้า; ของตกแต่งคอนโซลหน้า; รูปลอก/สติกเกอร์; ตราสัญลักษณ์/ป้ายสัญลักษณ์; ของประดับแขวนกระจกมองหลัง; ที่ครอบหัวลาก; ที่ครอบป้ายทะเบียน; กรอบป้ายทะเบียน; แม่เหล็ก; ที่หุ้มหัวเกียร์; ที่หุ้มพวงมาลัย; ฝาปิดจุกลม; ธงติดหน้าต่าง; อื่นๆ
sv: Ingående artiklar i fordonsdekorationsset: Luftfräschare; Antennboll; Matta/underlägg för instrumentpanel; Prydnad för instrumentpanel; Dekal/klistermärke; Emblem/märke; Hängande prydnad för backspegel; Dragkroksskydd; Skydd för registreringsskylt; Ram för registreringsskylt; Magnet; Skydd för växelspaksknopp; Rattmuff/rattskydd; Ventilhattar; Fönsterflagga; Övrigt
ko: 차량 장식 세트 구성품: 공기 청정제; 안테나 볼; 대시보드 매트/라이너; 대시보드 장식품; 데칼/스티커; 엠블럼/배지; 룸미러용 행잉 장식품; 히치 커버; 번호판 커버; 번호판 프레임; 자석; 기어 노브 커버; 스티어링 휠 커버; 밸브 스템 캡; 윈도우 플래그; 기타
sk-SK: Súprava dekorácií vozidla v cene: Osviežovač vzduchu; Gulička na anténu; Podložka na palubnú dosku; Ozdoba na palubnú dosku; Nálepka; Znak/odznak; Závesná ozdoba na spätné zrkadlo; Kryt ťažného zariadenia; Kryt evidenčného čísla vozidla; Rám evidenčného čísla vozidla; Magnet; Kryt radiacej páky; Kryt volantu; Krytky ventilov; Vlajočka na okno; Iné
zh-CN: 车辆装饰套装包含物品: 空气清新剂; 天线球; 仪表盘防滑垫/衬垫; 仪表盘摆件; 贴花/贴纸; 徽标/车标; 后视镜挂件; 拖车挂钩盖; 车牌盖; 车牌框; 磁贴; 换挡把套; 方向盘套; 气门嘴帽; 车窗旗; 其他
en: Vehicle decor set items included: Air freshener; Antenna ball; Dashboard mat/liner; Dashboard ornament; Decal/sticker; Emblem/badge; Hanging rear-view mirror ornament; Hitch cover; License plate cover; License plate frame; Magnet; Shift knob cover; Steering wheel cover; Valve stem caps; Window flag; Other
hu: Jármű dekor készlet tétel tartalmazza: Légfrissítő; Antennagömb; Műszerfalszőnyeg / -alátét; Műszerfaldísz; Matrica; Embléma / Jelvény; Lógó visszapillantótükör-dísz; Vonóhorog-takaró; Rendszámtábla-takaró; Rendszámtáblakeret; Mágnes; Sebességváltógomb-huzat; Kormányvédő; Szelepkupakok; Ablakzászló; Egyéb
hr-HR: Uključen set za ukrašavanje vozila: Osvježivač zraka; Ukrasna kuglica za antenu; Podloga za armaturnu ploču; Ukras za armaturnu ploču; Naljepnica; Amblem/značka; Viseći ukras za retrovizor; Poklopac kuke za vuču; Zaštita registarske pločice; Okvir registarske pločice; Magnet; Navlaka za ručicu mjenjača; Navlaka za volan; Kapice ventila; Zastavica za prozor; Ostalo
bg-BG: Включени елементи в комплекта за декорация на автомобил: Освежител за въздух; Топка за антена; Постелка/подложка за табло за управление; Орнамент за табло за управление; Стикер/лепенка; Емблема/значка; Висящ орнамент за огледало за обратно виждане; Капачка за теглич; Покритие за регистрационна табела; Рамка за регистрационна табела; Магнит; Калъф за топка на скоростен лост; Калъф за волан; Капачки за вентили; Флагче за прозорец; Друго
ja: 車両装飾セット同梱品: 芳香剤; アンテナボール; ダッシュボードマット/ライナー; ダッシュボードオーナメント; デカール/ステッカー; エンブレム/バッジ; 吊り下げ式ルームミラーオーナメント; ヒッチカバー; ナンバープレートカバー; ナンバープレートフレーム; マグネット; シフトノブカバー; ステアリングホイールカバー; バルブステムキャップ; ウィンドウフラッグ; その他
nl: Voertuigdecoratieset meegeleverde items: Luchtverfrisser; Antennebal; Dashboardmat/-voering; Dashboardornament; Decal/sticker; Embleem/badge; Hangend binnenspiegelornament; Trekhaakdop; Kentekenplaathoes; Kentekenplaathouder; Magneet; Versnellingspookhoes; Stuurhoes; Ventieldoppen; Raamvlag; Overig
el: Περιλαμβανόμενα είδη σετ διακόσμησης οχήματος: Αποσμητικό χώρου; Μπαλάκι κεραίας; Πατάκι/Κάλυμμα ταμπλό; Διακοσμητικό ταμπλό; Χαλκομανία/Αυτοκόλλητο; Έμβλημα/Σήμα; Κρεμαστό διακοσμητικό κεντρικού καθρέπτη; Κάλυμμα κοτσαδόρου; Κάλυμμα πινακίδας; Πλαίσιο πινακίδας; Μαγνήτης; Κάλυμμα λεβιέ ταχυτήτων; Κάλυμμα τιμονιού; Τάπες βαλβίδων; Σημαιάκι παραθύρου; Άλλο
lt-LT: Įtraukti transporto priemonės dekoravimo rinkinio elementai: Automobilio oro gaiviklis; Antenos rutuliukas; Prietaisų skydelio kilimėlis / danga; Prietaisų skydelio papuošimas; Lipdukas; Emblema / ženkliukas; Kabinamas galinio vaizdo veidrodėlio papuošimas; Kablio dangtelis; Valstybinio numerio dangtelis; Valstybinio numerio rėmelis; Magnetas; Pavarų svirties rankenėlės apvalkalas; Vairo užvalkalas; Vožtuvų kotelių gaubteliai; Lango vėliavėlė; Kita
tr: Dahil olan araç dekor seti ürünleri: Araba kokusu; Anten topu; Ön panel matı/örtüsü; Ön panel süsü; Dekal/çıkartma; Amblem/arma; Dikiz aynası süsü; Römork bağlantı kapağı; Plaka kılıfı; Plaka çerçevesi; Mıknatıs; Vites topuzu kılıfı; Direksiyon kılıfı; Supap kapakları; Cam bayrağı; Diğer
nb: Bil-dekorsett inkludert: Luftfrisker; Antenneball; Instrumentbordmatte/-trekk; Pynt til instrumentbord; Dekal/klistremerke; Emblem/merke; Hengende pynt til bakspeil; Hengerfestedeksel; Nummerskiltdeksel; Nummerskiltramme; Magnet; Girkuledeksel; Rattrekk; Ventilhetter; Vindusflagg; Annet
vi: Bộ trang trí xe mặt hàng; mục bao gồm: Nước hoa/sáp thơm; Bóng gắn ăng-ten; Thảm/tấm lót táp-lô; Đồ trang trí táp-lô; Đề-can/nhãn dán; Biểu tượng/huy hiệu; Đồ treo gương chiếu hậu; Nắp đậy móc kéo; Ốp biển số; Khung biển số; Nam châm; Bọc cần số; Bọc vô lăng; Nắp van lốp; Cờ gắn cửa sổ; Khác
zh-TW: 包含車用裝飾組品項: 空氣清新劑; 天線球; 儀表板墊/內襯墊; 儀表板擺飾; 轉印貼/貼紙; 標誌/徽章; 後照鏡吊飾; 拖車聯結器蓋; 車牌蓋; 車牌框; 磁鐵; 排檔頭保護套; 方向盤套; 氣門嘴蓋; 車窗旗; 其他
pt-BR: Conjunto de decoração veicular itens incluídos: Aromatizador de ambiente; Enfeite de antena; Tapete/forro para painel; Enfeite para painel; Decalque/adesivo; Emblema/distintivo; Enfeite pendente para retrovisor; Capa para engate; Capa para placa de licença; Moldura para placa de licença; Ímã; Capa para manopla de câmbio; Capa para volante; Tampas de válvula de pneu; Bandeira para janela; Outro
fi: Ajoneuvon koristesarjaan sisältyvät tuotteet: Ilmanraikastin; Antennipallo; Kojelaudan matto/suoja; Kojelaudan koriste; Siirtokuva/tarra; Tunnus/merkki; Taustapeilistä riippuva koriste; Vetokoukun suojus; Rekisterikilven suojus; Rekisterikilven kehys; Magneetti; Vaihteenvalitsimen nupin suojus; Ohjauspyörän suojus; Venttiilinhatut; Ikkunalippu; Muu
pl: Elementy dołączone do zestawu dekoracji pojazdu: Odświeżacz powietrza; Ozdoba na antenę; Mata na deskę rozdzielczą; Ozdoba na deskę rozdzielczą; Kalkomania/naklejka; Emblemat/odznaka; Wisząca ozdoba na lusterko wsteczne; Zaślepka haka holowniczego; Osłona tablicy rejestracyjnej; Ramka na tablicę rejestracyjną; Magnes; Pokrowiec na gałkę zmiany biegów; Pokrowiec na kierownicę; Kapturki na wentyle; Flaga na szybę; Inne
es: Artículos incluidos en el set de decoración para vehículos: Ambientador; Bola para antena; Alfombrilla/cubierta para tablero; Adorno para tablero; Calcomanía/pegatina; Emblema/insignia; Adorno colgante para espejo retrovisor; Cubierta para enganche; Cubierta para placa de matrícula; Marco para placa de matrícula; Imán; Funda para palanca de cambios; Funda para volante; Tapones para vástagos de válvula; Bandera para ventana; Otro
pt-PT: Itens incluídos no conjunto decorativo para veículo: Ambientador; Bola de antena; Tapete/forro do painel de instrumentos; Enfeite do painel de instrumentos; Autocolante; Emblema; Enfeite pendente para espelho retrovisor; Cobertura do reboque; Cobertura da matrícula; Moldura da matrícula; Íman; Cobertura da alavanca de velocidades; Cobertura do volante; Tampas de haste da válvula; Bandeira de janela; Outro
da: Medfølgende dele i pyntesæt til køretøj: Luftfrisker; Antennebold; Måtte/underlag til instrumentbræt; Pynt til instrumentbræt; Mærkat/klistermærke; Emblem/badge; Hængende pynt til bakspejl; Trækkrogscover; Nummerpladecover; Nummerpladeramme; Magnet; Cover til gearstang; Ratovertræk; Ventilhætter; Vinduesflag; Andet
it: Articoli inclusi nel set di decorazioni per veicoli: Deodorante per auto; Sfera per antenna; Tappetino per cruscotto; Ornamento per cruscotto; Decalcomania/adesivo; Emblema/stemma; Ornamento da appendere allo specchietto retrovisore; Coprigancio di traino; Copritarga; Portatarga; Magnete; Copripomello del cambio; Coprivolante; Cappucci delle valvole; Bandierina per finestrino; Altro
cs: Obsah dekorační sady: Osvěžovač vzduchu; Ozdoba na anténu; Podložka na palubní desku; Ozdoba na palubní desku; Nálepka / samolepka; Znak/odznak; Závěsná ozdoba na zpětné zrcátko; Kryt tažného zařízení; Kryt registrační značky; Rámeček registrační značky; Magnet; Kryt řadicí páky; Potah na volant; Čepičky ventilků; Vlaječka na okno; Jiné
de: Enthaltene Teile des Fahrzeugdekor-Sets: Lufterfrischer; Antennenball; Armaturenbrettmatte/-abdeckung; Armaturenbrett-Ornament; Aufkleber/Sticker; Emblem/Abzeichen; Hängendes Rückspiegel-Ornament; Anhängerkupplungsabdeckung; Kennzeichenabdeckung; Kennzeichenhalter; Magnet; Schaltknaufabdeckung; Lenkradbezug; Ventilkappen; Fensterflagge; Sonstiges
ru: Комплект элементов автомобильного декора: Освежитель воздуха; Насадка на антенну; Коврик на приборную панель; Украшение на приборную панель; Декаль/наклейка; Эмблема/значок; Подвеска на зеркало заднего вида; Заглушка для фаркопа; Крышка номерного знака; Рамка номерного знака; Магнит; Чехол на ручку КПП; Оплетка на руль; Колпачки на ниппели; Флажок на стекло; Другое
fr: Éléments inclus dans l’ensemble de décoration automobile: Diffuseur de parfum; Boule d’antenne; Tapis de tableau de bord; Ornement de tableau de bord; Autocollant; Emblème/insigne; Ornement suspendu pour rétroviseur; Cache-attelage; Protection de plaque d’immatriculation; Cadre de plaque d’immatriculation; Aimant; Housse de pommeau de levier de vitesse; Housse de volant; Bouchons de valve; Drapeau pour vitre; Autre
sl-SI: Vključeni predmeti v kompletu dekoracije za vozilo: Osvežilec zraka; Kroglica za anteno; Podloga za armaturno ploščo; Okras za armaturno ploščo; Nalepka; Emblem/značka; Viseči okras za vzvratno ogledalo; Pokrov vlečne kljuke; Pokrov registrske tablice; Okvir za registrsko tablico; Magnet; Pokrov prestavne ročice; Prevleka za volan; Pokrovčki ventilov; Zastavica za okno; Drugo